Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,135
Notice; how given.

Whenever any notice required to be given by the Tax Commissioner under the provisions of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 may be given by mail, it shall be given by first-class, registered, or certified mail or, with the written permission of the taxpayer, by electronic mail or other electronic means in a secure manner as determined by the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 135, p. 1637;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 44;

Laws 2024, LB146, § 2.